Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-218
Contracts; laws governing.

All contracts for the acquisition, construction, enlargement, improvement, maintenance, equipment or operation of airports or other air navigation facilities, made by the municipality itself or through the agency of the Department of Aeronautics, shall be made pursuant to the laws of this state governing the making of like contracts; Provided, however, that where such acquisition, construction, improvement, enlargement, maintenance, equipment or operation is financed wholly or partly with federal money the municipality, or the Department of Aeronautics as its agent, may let contracts in the manner prescribed by the federal authorities, acting under the laws of the United States, and any rules or regulations made thereunder.

Laws 1945, c. 34, § 9(3), p. 164.